Utah statutes.
31A-8a-103.   Scope and purposes.

(1)  A person shall comply with the provisions of this chapter if the person operates a health discount program in this state.

(2)  Notwithstanding any provision in this title, a person who only operates or markets a health discount program is exempt from:

(a)  Section 31A-4-113;

(b)  Section 31A-4-113.5;

(c)  Chapter 6a, Service Contracts;

(d)  Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations;

(e)  Section 31A-8-209;

(f)  Section 31A-8-211;

(g)  Section 31A-8-214;

(h)  Chapters 9 through 12;

(i)  Chapters 17 and 18;

(j)  Chapter 19a, Utah Rate Regulation Act;

(k)  Sections 31A-23a-103 and 31A-23a-104;

(l)  Chapters 25 and 26;

(m)  Chapters 28 and 29; and

(n)  Chapters 35 through 38.

(3)  A person licensed under this title as an accident and health insurer or health maintenance organization:

(a)  is not required to obtain a license as required by Section 31A-8a-201 to operate a health discount program; and

(b)  is required to comply with all other provisions of this chapter.

(4)  The purposes of this chapter include:

(a)  full disclosure in the sale of health discount programs;

(b)  reasonable regulation of the marketing and disclosure practices of health discount program operators; and

(c)  licensing standards for health discount programs.



Enacted by Chapter 58, 2005 General Session

